dev/verbs/ceb-tests.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ceb-gen.fst
    Morph: ceb-morph.fst

Tests:
  Verb - kamao:
    kamao+V+Inf: kamao
    kamao+V+Act+Temp+Pres: [mikamao, nikamao]
    kamao+V+Act+Temp+Past: [mikamao, nikamao]
    kamao+V+Act+Temp+Fut: mokamao
    kamao+V+Act+Dur+Pres: [nagakamao, nagkamao]
    kamao+V+Act+Dur+Past: [nagakamao, nagkamao]
    kamao+V+Act+Dur+Fut: [magakamao, magkamao]
    kamao+V+Act+TempDur+Com: pagkamao
    kamao+V+Act+Stat+Pres: nakamao
    kamao+V+Act+Stat+Past: nakamao
    kamao+V+Act+Stat+Fut: makamao
    kamao+V+Act+Stat+Com: [kakamao, pagkakamao]
    kamao+V+Act+Abi+Pres: nakakamao
    kamao+V+Act+Abi+Past: nakakamao
    kamao+V+Act+Abi+Fut: makakamao
    kamao+V+Act+Pl+Pres: nangkamao
    kamao+V+Act+Pl+Past: nangkamao
    kamao+V+Act+Pl+Fut: mangkamao
    kamao+V+DirP+TempDur+Pres: gikamao
    kamao+V+DirP+TempDur+Past: gikamao
    kamao+V+DirP+TempDur+Fut: kamaohon
    kamao+V+DirP+TempDur+Com: kamaoha
    kamao+V+DirP+Abi+Pres: nakamao
    kamao+V+DirP+Abi+Past: nakamao
    kamao+V+DirP+Abi+Fut: makamao
    kamao+V+IndP+TempDur+Pres: gikamaohan
    kamao+V+IndP+TempDur+Past: gikamaohan
    kamao+V+IndP+TempDur+Fut: kamaohan
    kamao+V+IndP+TempDur+Com: kamaohi
    kamao+V+Inst+TempDur+Pres: gikamao
    kamao+V+Inst+TempDur+Past: gikamao
    kamao+V+Inst+TempDur+Fut: ikamao
    kamao+V+Inst+TempDur+Com: ikamao

  Verb - hilak:
    hilak+V+Inf: hilak
    hilak+V+Act+Temp+Pres: [mihilak, nihilak]
    hilak+V+Act+Temp+Past: [mihilak, nihilak]
    hilak+V+Act+Temp+Fut: mohilak
    hilak+V+Act+Dur+Pres: [nagahilak, naghilak]
    hilak+V+Act+Dur+Past: [nagahilak, naghilak]
    hilak+V+Act+Dur+Fut: [magahilak, maghilak]
    hilak+V+Act+TempDur+Com: paghilak
    hilak+V+Act+Stat+Pres: nahilak
    hilak+V+Act+Stat+Past: nahilak
    hilak+V+Act+Stat+Fut: mahilak
    hilak+V+Act+Stat+Com: [kahilak, pagkahilak]
    hilak+V+Act+Abi+Pres: nakahilak
    hilak+V+Act+Abi+Past: nakahilak
    hilak+V+Act+Abi+Fut: makahilak
    hilak+V+Act+Pl+Pres: nanghilak
    hilak+V+Act+Pl+Past: nanghilak
    hilak+V+Act+Pl+Fut: manghilak
    hilak+V+DirP+TempDur+Pres: gihilak
    hilak+V+DirP+TempDur+Past: gihilak
    hilak+V+DirP+TempDur+Fut: hilakon
    hilak+V+DirP+TempDur+Com: hilaka
    hilak+V+DirP+Abi+Pres: nahilak
    hilak+V+DirP+Abi+Past: nahilak
    hilak+V+DirP+Abi+Fut: mahilak
    hilak+V+IndP+TempDur+Pres: gihilakan
    hilak+V+IndP+TempDur+Past: gihilakan
    hilak+V+IndP+TempDur+Fut: hilakan
    hilak+V+IndP+TempDur+Com: hilaki
    hilak+V+Inst+TempDur+Pres: gihilak
    hilak+V+Inst+TempDur+Past: gihilak
    hilak+V+Inst+TempDur+Fut: ihilak
    hilak+V+Inst+TempDur+Com: ihilak
